Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-5702
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it is the policy of this
state to make revisions in Nebraska's tax structure in order to (1) encourage new businesses
to relocate to Nebraska, (2) retain
existing businesses and aid in their expansion, (3) promote the creation and retention of new, quality jobs in Nebraska, specifically jobs related to research
and development, manufacturing, and large data centers, and (4) attract and retain investment
capital in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 24;

Laws 2014, LB836, § 3.
July 18, 2014